Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB757.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Short title.This act shall be known and may be cited as the Public Employer Collective Bargaining Transparency Act.Section 2. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this act shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Employee organization." An organization, agency, employee representation committee or plan in which membership includes public employees and that exists for the purpose, in whole or in part, of dealing with employers concerning grievances, employee-employer disputes, wages, rates of pay, hours of employment or conditions of work. The term does not include any organization 123456789101112131415161718 that practices discrimination in membership because of race, color, creed, national origin or political affiliation."Proposed collective bargaining agreement." Any terms of bargaining between a public employer and an employee organization covering public employee wages, benefits and working conditions that have been reduced to writing under section 701 of the act of July 23, 1970 (P.L.563, No.195), known as the Public Employe Relations Act."Public employee" or "employee." An individual employed by a public employer. The term does not include any of the following:(1) Elected officials.(2) Appointees of the Governor with the advice and consent of the Senate as required by law.(3) Management-level employees.(4) Confidential employees.(5) Clergymen or other individuals in a religious profession, employees or personnel at church offices or facilities when utilized primarily for religious purposes.(6) Employees covered under the act of June 24, 1968 (P.L.237, No.111), referred to as the Policemen and Firemen Collective Bargaining Act."Public employer." As follows:(1) The Commonwealth and its political subdivisions and any officer, board, commission, agency, authority or other instrumentality of the Commonwealth.(2) The term does not include employers subject to the act of June 1, 1937 (P.L.1168, No.294), known as the Pennsylvania Labor Relations Act, or 29 U.S.C. Ch. 7 Subch. II (relating to national labor relations).Section 3. Notice of collective bargaining agreement.20250SB0757PN0814 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (a) Notice.--A public employer shall provide notice under subsection (b) prior to signing a proposed collective bargaining agreement. The notice shall include all of the following:(1) A statement of the terms of the proposed collective bargaining agreement.(2) An estimate of the costs to the public employer associated with the proposed collective bargaining agreement.(b) Posting.--The notice required shall be posted on the public employer's publicly accessible Internet website beginning at least two weeks prior to the signing of the proposed collective bargaining agreement and continuing until at least 30 days after the signing of the collective bargaining agreement. If a public employer does not have a publicly accessible Internet website, the public employer shall publish in printed format the required notice once at least two weeks prior to the signing of the proposed collective bargaining agreement and make the notice publicly accessible in the main office of the public employer.(c) Unenforceability.--A collective bargaining agreement executed without providing the notice required under this section shall be void and unenforceable in its entirety.Section 4. Open records.A proposed collective bargaining agreement made by a public employer or received by a public employer from an employee organization shall be:(1) A public record subject to inspection and duplication.(2) Posted on the public employer's publicly accessible Internet website within 48 hours of receipt of the proposed collective bargaining agreement.20250SB0757PN0814 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Section 5. Applicability.This act shall apply to a proposed collective bargaining agreement made on or after the effective date of this section.Section 6. Effective date.This act shall take effect in 30 days.20250SB0757PN0814 - 4 - 12345